Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.741

Washington State University bond retirement fund—Disposition of certain revenues from scientific school lands.

All moneys received from the lease or rental of lands set apart by the enabling act for a scientific school; all interest or income arising from the proceeds of the sale of such lands or of the timber, fallen timber, stone, gravel or other valuable material thereon, except for investment income derived pursuant to RCW 43.84.080 and, less the allocation to the state investment board expense account pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160; and all moneys received as interest on deferred payments on contracts for the sale of such lands shall be deposited in the "Washington State University bond retirement fund" to be expended for the purposes set forth in RCW 28B.30.740.

[ 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 76; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.741. Prior: 1965 c 77 s 1. Formerly RCW 28.80.541.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.